Washington statutes.
RCW 2.28.060

Judicial officers—Powers.

Every judicial officer has power:

(1) To preserve and enforce order in his or her immediate presence and in the proceedings before him or her, when he or she is engaged in the performance of a duty imposed upon him or her by law;

(2) To compel obedience to his or her lawful orders as provided by law;

(3) To compel the attendance of persons to testify in a proceeding pending before him or her, in the cases and manner provided by law;

(4) To administer oaths to persons in a proceeding pending before him or her, and in all other cases where it may be necessary in the exercise of his or her powers and the performance of his or her duties.

[ 2011 c 336 s 40; 1955 c 38 s 13; 1891 c 54 s 6; RRS s 57.]

NOTES:

Compelling attendance of witnesses: Chapter 5.56 RCW.

Oaths, who may administer: RCW 5.28.010.